src/third_party/hunspell/tests/condition.aff
SET ISO8859-2
WORDCHARS 0123456789

SFX S N 18
SFX S   0 suf1 .
SFX S   0 suf2  o
SFX S   0 suf3  [aeou]
SFX S   0 suf4  [^o]
SFX S   0 suf5  [^aeou]
SFX S   0 suf6  fo
SFX S   0 suf7  f[aeou]
SFX S   0 suf8  f[^o]
SFX S   0 suf9  f[^aeou]
SFX S   0 suf10 [aefu]o
SFX S   0 suf11 [^f]o
SFX S   0 suf12 [^aefu]o
SFX S   0 suf13 [aefu][^aefu]
SFX S   0 suf14 [^aeou][aeou]
SFX S   0 suf15 [aeou][^aefu]
SFX S   0 suf16 [^aeou][^aefu]
SFX S   0 suf17 [aeou][bcdfgkmnoprstvz]
SFX S   0 suf18 [aeou]o

SFX Q N 2
SFX Q   0 ning  [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX Q   0 ing   [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]

SFX T N 1
SFX T   y ies   .[^aeiou]y

PFX U N 1
PFX U 0 un wr.

SFX Z Y 3
SFX Z   0           ch         [áéíóàúýô].a
SFX Z   0           m          [áéíóàúýô].a
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúàýô].a

PFX P N 18
PFX P   0 pre1 .
PFX P   0 pre2  o
PFX P   0 pre3  [aeou]
PFX P   0 pre4  [^o]
PFX P   0 pre5  [^aeou]
PFX P   0 pre6  of
PFX P   0 pre7  o[aefou]
PFX P   0 pre8  o[^f]
PFX P   0 pre9  o[^aefu]
PFX P   0 pre10 [aefu]o
PFX P   0 pre11 [^f]o
PFX P   0 pre12 [^aefou]o
PFX P   0 pre13 [aeou][aefu]
PFX P   0 pre14 [aeou][^aeou]
PFX P   0 pre15 [aeou][^aefu]
PFX P   0 pre16 [^aefu][^aeou]
PFX P   0 pre17 [bcdfgkmnoprstvz][aeou]
PFX P   0 pre18 o[aeou]


PFX R N 2
PFX R   0 gnin  n[aeiou][^aeio]
PFX R   0 gni   [bcdfgkmnprstvz][aeiou][aeio]
