src/third_party/hunspell/tests/condition.wrong
ofosuf4
pre4ofo
ofosuf5
pre5ofo
ofosuf8
pre8ofo
ofosuf9
pre9ofo
ofosuf11
pre10ofo
pre11ofo
ofosuf12
pre12ofo
ofosuf15
pre15ofo
ofosuf17
pre17ofo
ofosuf18
pre18ofo
entertainning
gninnianretne
